District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.141

Reincorporation or incorporation of existing corporations.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 235, ch. 269, § 141
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 85-254, § 33
Oct. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-117, § 2, 25 DCR 1509
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(ww), (xx), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.141.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.42.
1973 Ed., § 29-952.